Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Chapter 25. Yellow Creek Watershed Authority

§ 51-25-1.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1977, ch. 372, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1977).

[Codes, 1942, § 5956-44: Laws, 1958, ch. 198, §§ 1-4]

§ 51-25-2.
Membership and organization of board.

There is hereby created the Yellow Creek Watershed Authority composed of the geographic boundaries of the counties of Alcorn, Prentiss, and Tishomingo in the State of Mississippi which shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of nine (9) members. Three (3) members shall be appointed by the governor, one (1) from each of the counties in which the said watershed lies, all to be appointed for a term of four (4) years or until their successors are appointed and qualified. The board of supervisors of each of the three (3) counties involved shall appoint one (1) member. The three (3) counties involved shall appoint one (1) member. The three (3) members appointed by the supervisors shall serve staggered terms of four (4) years. The mayors of all incorporated municipalities within each of the three (3) counties shall appoint one (1) person from their county who shall be selected by a majority of the mayors. The three (3) members appointed by the mayors shall serve staggered terms of four (4) years. For the initial appointments, each board of supervisors and group of mayors shall appoint one (1) member for two (2) years, one (1) member for three (3) years, and one (1) member for four years. The initial appointment for the board of supervisors shall be as follows: Alcorn County, two (2) years, Tishomingo County, three (3) years, and Prentiss County, four (4) years. The initial appointment for the mayors shall be: Prentiss County, two (2) years, Alcorn County, three (3) years, and Tishomingo County, four (4) years. Board members shall be appointed by the appointing authorities within sixty (60) days after passage of this section. Board members shall serve without pay except for their actual traveling expenses and other necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties, to be reimbursed as in the case of state employees under the provisions of general law from such funds as may be available to the authority. Upon appointment said members shall meet and organize at Iuka, Mississippi, set a regular time and place for the meetings of the authority, and secure offices and all necessary equipment therefor. A full-time executive director may be appointed by the board if the board deems the appointment advisable, and, if a director is appointed, he shall be full-time and shall serve at the pleasure of the board. The salary of a director may be paid out of such funds as may be available to the authority or from any source.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 372, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1977).

§ 51-25-3.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1977, ch. 372, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1977).

[Codes, 1942, § 5956-44; Laws, 1958, ch. 198, §§ 1-4]

§ 51-25-4.
Powers and duties.

The Yellow Creek Watershed Authority is hereby specifically authorized and empowered to contract with and to be contracted with by the Tennessee Valley Authority and any other agency or agencies of the federal government or of any state or subdivision thereof which may be of assistance in carrying out the purposes set forth herein, and to do any and all other things necessary or desirable in effectuating a plan for the comprehensive development of the resources of the said watershed, including but not limited to such subjects as agriculture, forestry, drainage and flood control, land reclamation, electric power utilization, irrigation, water conservation, recreation, public health and education, said program of development to be carried on in cooperation with the appropriate local, state and federal agencies. All agencies of the State of Mississippi are hereby authorized, empowered, and directed to extend their cooperation and assistance to the said Yellow Creek Watershed Authority in the formulation and implementation of the said program of development.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 372, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1977).

§ 51-25-5.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1977, ch. 372, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1977).

[Codes, 1942, § 5956-44; Laws, 1958, ch. 198, §§ 1-4]

§ 51-25-6.
Financing.

Each of the counties in which the said Yellow Creek Watershed is located is hereby authorized and empowered to contribute any amount or amounts which the board of supervisors thereof shall deem advisable, acting in their sole discretion, to be paid from the general county fund of the respective counties.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 372, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1977).

§ 51-25-7.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1977, ch. 372, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1977).

[Codes, 1942, § 5956-44; Laws, 1958, ch. 198, §§ 1-4]

§ 51-25-8.
Chapter supplementary to other laws.

This chapter shall be considered supplemental and additional to any and all other laws and confers sufficient authority in and of itself for the purposes set forth herein.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 372, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1977).